Massachusetts, session 194th, H961.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 21A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by striking section 24 and inserting in the place thereof the following
section:-
Section 24. There shall be an office of the state climatologist which shall be independent
of the executive office and under the supervision and control of a state climatologist to be
appointed by the secretary. The office of the state climatologist shall be housed by the University
of Massachusetts system and shall: (i) gather and analyze data on climate conditions in the
commonwealth; (ii) conduct and foster research concerning the climate in the commonwealth
and look for opportunities for sponsored research concerning climate issues in the
commonwealth; (iii) coordinate with the National Centers for Environmental Information and the
Northeast Regional Climate Center both of the United States Department of Commerce/National
Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, the Northeast Regional Climate Adaptation Science
of 2

Center of the United States Department of the Interior, and the Northeast Climate Hub of the
United States Department of Agriculture; and (iv) educate and inform the public on matters
related to the climate. The office of the state climatologist shall advise branches of state and local
government concerning the climate in the commonwealth and its implications for both economic
and scientific needs in conjunction with existing and future environmental factors relating to the
climate in the commonwealth. The office of the state climatologist shall maintain a liaison with
state, academic, and scientific institutions and join federal and international climate interest
groups. The state climatologist shall serve for a term of 5 years but may be reappointed. The
office of the state climatologist shall be funded by the executive office.
of 2